Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle C. Appeals Upon Denial of Registration.

§ 23-15-61.
Appeal by person denied registration.

Any person denied the right to register as a voter may appeal from the decision of the county registrar to the board of election commissioners by filing with the county registrar, on the same day of the denial or within five (5) days after the denial, a written application for appeal.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-55 [Codes, 1892, § 3624; 1906, § 4131; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6765; 1930, § 6196; 1942, § 3224; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 16; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2017).

§ 23-15-63.
Appeal by other elector of allowance of registration.

Any elector of the county may likewise appeal from the decision of the county registrar allowing any other person to be registered as a voter; but before the same can be heard, the party appealing shall give notice to the person whose registration is appealed from, in writing, stating the grounds of the appeal. The notice shall be served by the sheriff or a constable, as process in other courts is required to be served; and the officer may demand and receive for such service, from the person requesting the same, the sum of One Dollar ($1.00).

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-57 [Codes, 1892, § 3625; 1906, § 4132; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6766; 1930, § 6197; 1942, § 3225; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 17; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2017).

§ 23-15-65.
Determination of appeals at September meeting of board of election commissioners.

The board of election commissioners shall meet at the courthouse of its county on the second Monday in September preceding any general election, and shall remain in session from day to day, so long as business may require. Three (3) election commissioners shall constitute a quorum to do business; but the concurrence of at least three (3) election commissioners shall be necessary in all cases for the rendition of a decision. The election commissioners shall hear and determine all appeals from the decisions of the registrar of their county, allowing or refusing the applications of electors to be registered; and they shall correct illegal or improper registrations, and shall secure the elective franchise, as affected by registration, to those who may be illegally or improperly denied the same.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-59 [Codes, 1892, § 3623; 1906, § 4130; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6764; 1930, § 6198; 1942, § 3226; Laws, 1968, ch. 569, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 21; Laws, 1968, ch. 569, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 21; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 18; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-67.
Determination of appeals at other meetings.

The election commissioners of each county shall, at the meetings provided for in Sections 23-15-123, 23-15-155 and 23-15-157, hear and determine any appeals which may have been perfected and which are pending on the respective dates provided for in Sections 23-15-123, 23-15-155 and 23-15-157, from the decisions of the registrar of their county allowing or refusing the applications of persons to be registered. The above dates for hearing the appeals are supplemental to the provisions of Section 23-15-65.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-61 [Codes, 1942, § 3226.5; Laws, 1960, ch. 446; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 19; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-69.
Appeals heard de novo; finality of decisions.

All cases on appeal shall be heard by the boards of election commissioners de novo, and oral and documentary evidence may be heard by them; and they are authorized to administer oaths to witnesses before them; and they have power to subpoena witnesses, and to compel their attendance; to send for persons and papers; to require the sheriff and constables to attend them and to execute their process. The decisions of the commissioners in all cases shall be final as to questions of fact, but as to matters of law they may be revised by circuit courts and the Supreme Court. The registrar shall obey the orders of the commissioners in directing a person to be registered, or a name to be stricken from the Statewide Elections Management System.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-63 [Codes, 1892, § 3626; 1906, § 4133; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6767; 1930, § 6199; 1942, § 3227; Laws, 1960, ch. 450; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 20; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2017).

§ 23-15-71.
Appeal from decision of commissioners.

Any elector aggrieved by the decision of the commissioners shall have the right to file a bill of exceptions thereto, to be approved and signed by the commissioners, embodying the evidence in the case and the findings of the commissioners, within two (2) days after the rendition of the decision, and may thereupon appeal to the circuit court upon the execution of a bond, with two (2) or more sufficient sureties to be approved by the commissioners, in the sum of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), payable to the state, and conditioned to pay all costs in case the appeal shall not be successfully prosecuted; and in case the decision of the commissioners be affirmed, judgment shall be entered on the bond for all costs.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-65 [Codes, 1892, § 3627; 1906, § 4134; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6768; 1930, § 6200; 1942, § 3228; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 21, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-73.
Duty of commissioners upon appeal.

It shall be the duty of the commissioners, in case of appeal from their decision, to return the bill of exceptions and the appeal bond into the circuit court of the county within five (5) days after the filing of the same with them; and the circuit courts shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine such appeals.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-67 [Codes, 1892, § 3628; 1906, § 4135; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6769; 1930, § 6201; 1942, § 3229; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 22, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-75.
Proceedings in circuit court.

Should the judgment of the circuit court be in favor of the right of an elector to be registered, the court shall so order, and shall, by its judgment, direct the registrar of the county forthwith to register him. Costs shall not, in any case, be adjudged against the county.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-69 [Codes, 1892, § 3629; 1906, § 4136; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6770; 1930, § 6202; 1942, § 3230; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 23, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-77.
Costs.

The election commissioners shall not award costs in proceedings before them; but circuit courts and the Supreme Court shall allow costs as in other cases.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-71 [Codes, 1892, § 3630; 1906, § 4137; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6771; 1930, § 6203; 1942, § 3231; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 64; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 24, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-79.
Date of registration to vote.

Unless the application for registration was made pursuant to Section 23-15-47, the date of registration to vote shall be the date the application for registration to vote was initially received by the registrar or, if submitted by mail, the postmark date, regardless of the date on which the county election commission, circuit court or Supreme Court, as the case may be, makes its final determination allowing the registration.

In the case of an application for registration that has been made pursuant to Section 23-15-47, the date of registration to vote shall be the date the complete and legible application form is received by the county registrar, or, if mailed, the postmark date of the complete and legible application.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-309 [Codes, 1942, § 3203-505; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 505; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 337]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 25; Laws, 1991, ch. 440, § 10; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2017).